District of Columbia statutes.
44-608

Conversion fee.

If a nonprofit entity is a party to a conversion approved pursuant to § 44-603, the District shall make an assessment, to recover part of the charitable assets, equal to 10% of the amount of the real property tax the healthcare entity would have paid during the past 5 years had it not been exempt from federal income taxation under sections 501(c) or (e) of the Internal Revenue Code. Such amount shall be paid in three equal installments.

History

Oct. 23, 1997, D.C. Law 12-32, § 9, 44 DCR 4819

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-558.

References in Text

Section 501 of the Internal Revenue Code, referred to in this section, is codified as 26 U.S.C. § 501.